Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,126
Insurance company; release of information; immune from liability.

Any insurance company, a person acting in its behalf, or an authorized agency releasing information, whether oral or written, pursuant to section 81-5,121 or 81-5,123 shall be immune from any liability arising out of a civil action or penalty resulting from a criminal prosecution.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 12.